Utah statutes.
57-13-2.   Creation of solar easement -- Writing required -- Contents --
Enforcement.
(1) Any property owner may grant a solar easement in the same manner and with
the same effect as a conveyance of an interest in real property. The easements
shall be created in writing and shall be filed, duly recorded and indexed in
the office of the recorder of the county in which the easement is granted.
Such easements shall run with the land or lands benefited and burdened and
shall constitute a perpetual easement, except that a solar easement may
terminate upon the conditions stated herein.
(2)  Any deed, will, or other instrument that creates a solar easement shall
include, but the contents need not be limited to:
(a)  a description of the real property subject to the solar easement and a
description of the real property benefiting from the solar easement;
(b)  a description of the vertical and horizontal angles, expressed in degrees
and measured from the site of the solar energy system, at which the solar
easement extends over the real property subject to the solar easement, or any
other description which defines the three dimensional space, or the place and
times of day in which an obstruction to direct sunlight is prohibited or
limited;
(c)  any terms or conditions under which the solar easement is granted or may
be terminated;
(d)  any provisions for compensation of the owner of the real property
benefiting from the solar easement in the event of interference with the
enjoyment of the solar easement, or compensation of the owner of the real
property subject to the solar easement, or compensation of the owner of the
real property subject to the solar easement for maintaining the solar
easement; and
(e)  any other provisions necessary or desirable to execute the instrument.
(3)  A solar easement may be enforced by injunction or proceedings in
injunction or other civil action.
